Utah statutes.
11-17-9.   Commingling of bond proceeds or revenues with other funds prohibited.

No part of the proceeds received from the sale of any bonds issued under this act, of any revenues derived from any project acquired or held under this act, or of any interest realized on money received under this act shall be commingled by the county or municipality with other funds of such county or municipality.

